Utah statutes.
63B-19-201.   Authorizations to design and construct capital facilities
using institutional or agency funds.
(1)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  Southern Utah University may, subject to the requirements of Title 63A,
Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and
Management, use $10,000,000 in donations and the revenue bond authorized in
Subsection 63B-19-102(6) to plan, design, and construct a Southern Utah Museum
of Arts, with 28,000 new square feet;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(2)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to the requirements of Title 63A,
Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and
Management, use $17,878,000 in donations, federal funds, and institutional
funds to plan, design, and construct an addition to the Henry Eyring Building,
with 40,915 new square feet;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(3)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  Utah State University may, subject to the requirements of Title 63A,
Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and
Management, use $3,000,000 in donations to plan, design, and construct a
Botanical Center classroom building, with 7,900 new square feet;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(4)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired in the Utah
State Office of Rehabilitation may, subject to the requirements of Title 63A,
Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and
Management, use $1,497,000 in federal grants to plan, design, and construct a
residential facility for the blind, with 8,000 new square feet;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the division may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(5)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the Department of Public Safety may, subject to the requirements of Title
63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and
Management, use $3,294,000 of nonlapsing balances within the driver license
line item in the Department of Public Safety budget in fiscal year 2010 to
plan, design, and construct an Ogden driver license building with 10,500 new
square feet;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the department may not request state funds for operation and maintenance
costs or capital improvements.
(6)  The Legislature intends that:
(a)  the University of Utah may use donations to prepare preliminary plans for
a dental school building;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of the planning; and
(c)  the University of Utah may not design or construct a dental school
building unless and until the Legislature authorizes:
(i)  the design and construction of a dental school building;
(ii)  the University to pursue the establishment of a dental school program;
and
(iii)  the appropriation of funds at a level sufficient to fund a dental
school program at the University of Utah.
